Hawaii statutes.
§304A-3205 Expenditures; reports.
Expenditures by the Hawaii commission, including the amounts fixed annually as
the equal contribution of each member to the compact, shall be made upon
warrants issued by the state comptroller based upon vouchers approved by any
one of the Hawaii commissioners. A report of the activities and expenses of
the Hawaii commissioners and a proposed program for the State's continuing
participation in the activities of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher
Education, including a budget request, shall be submitted by the Hawaii
commissioners to the legislature for each regular legislative session. [L 2006,
c 75, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 137, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next